Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Chapter 35. Commercial Fishermen’s Fund.

Administrative Code. —

For fishermen’s fund, see 8 AAC 55.

Collateral references. —

53 Am. Jur. 2d, Master and Servant, §§ 123, 124

82 Am. Jur. 2d Workers’ Compensation, §§ 1, 317-327.

99 C.J.S., Workmen’s Compensation, §§ 153-169.

Sec. 23.35.010.
Creation of Fishermen’s Fund Advisory and Appeals Council.

There is within the Department of Labor and Workforce Development a Fishermen’s Fund Advisory and Appeals Council.

History.

(§ 13 ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 93 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 23.35.020.
Appointment and composition of council.

The council is composed of the commissioner of labor and workforce development or a person designated by the commissioner and five members appointed by the governor for overlapping five year terms. The governor shall appoint one member from each of the following districts:

District 1: Wrangell and areas south;

District 2: Areas north of Wrangell to include Yakutat;

District 3: Areas west of Yakutat to East Coast of Alaska Peninsula, including Prince William Sound, Cook Inlet, and Kodiak;

District 4: Areas west of Alaska Peninsula to Cape Newenham, including Bristol Bay;

District 5: Areas north of Cape Newenham, including Kuskokwim, Yukon, Kotzebue, and the Arctic.

History.

(§ 13 ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 93 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 175 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of labor” was changed to “commissioner of labor and workforce development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 23.35.030.
Commissioner or designee as chair.

The commissioner of labor and workforce development or the person designated by the commissioner serves as the chair of the council.

History.

(§ 13 ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 93 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of labor” was changed to “commissioner of labor and workforce development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 23.35.040.
Duties of commissioner and council.

The council shall

review all denials of benefits made by the person responsible for the administration of the fund; and

make all initial determinations regarding claims for additional benefits under AS

23.35.140

.

Under regulations adopted by the department, the commissioner shall hear all appeals from the council’s denial of benefits and denials of claims for additional benefits under AS

23.35.140

. The commissioner’s decision is final and may be appealed as provided under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 13 ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 93 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 103 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For fishermen’s fund, see 8 AAC 55.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective June 26, 2010, repealed and reenacted the section.

Editor’s notes. —

Section. 4, ch. 103, SLA 2010 provides that the 2010 amendments to this section apply “to applications for benefits from the fishermen’s fund (AS

23.35.060

) or applications for additional benefits under AS

23.35.140

that are first submitted on or after June 26, 2010,” and that “[a]pplications for benefits and appeals pending on June 25, 2010, shall be resolved under [this section] as it read on that date before its amendment.”

Sec. 23.35.050.
Regulations.

The department may adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including those that are necessary or advisable to protect the fund by limiting or suspending payments from the fund.
The regulations must be uniform in application.

History.

(§ 2 ch 100 SLA 1951)

Administrative Code. —

For fishermen’s fund, see 8 AAC 55.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Department of Labor may not adopt a regulation requiring that a reasonable deductible amount be satisfied on each claim before the Fund pays benefits. March 4, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Labor could adopt regulations limiting the availability of benefits under AS 23.35 to persons who have no insurance, as this would accord with the department’s interpretation of the purpose of the Fund. March 4, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 23.35.060.
Creation and administration of fishermen’s fund.

There is created a fund, designated as the “fishermen’s fund.” The Department of Revenue is the custodian of the fund, and the Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall administer it. The fund shall be composed of

39 percent of the money derived by the state from all commercial fishermen’s licenses, not to exceed a maximum of $50 for each license holder for each year; and

money appropriated to carry out the purpose of this chapter.

The legislature may appropriate up to 50 percent of the interest income earned by the state on the balance of the fishermen’s fund for a grant for statewide marine safety training and education programs.

History.

(§ 4 ch 100 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 99 SLA 1955; am § 16 ch 105 SLA 1977; am § 11 ch 123 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 40 SLA 1997; am § 5 ch 44 SLA 1999; am § 6 ch 27 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 23.35.070.
Benefits.

A fisherman, upon becoming disabled, is entitled to receive benefits as follows: immediately after the fisherman sustains an injury or disability arising out of an accident directly connected with operations as a fisherman, either ashore in the state or in Alaska water, or suffers an occupational disease, the fisherman is entitled to emergency treatment, transportation to the nearest place where approved medical facilities are available, medical care, and hospitalization. In this section, “Alaska water” means the inland and territorial water of the state and the fishery conservation zone adjacent to the state established by 16 U.S.C. 1811 (§ 101, Fisheries Conservation and Management Act of 1976).

History.

(§ 5 ch 100 SLA 1951; am § 2 ch 99 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 59 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 15 SLA 1979)

Administrative Code. —

For fishermen’s fund, see 8 AAC 55.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Chiropractors render medical services and are entitled to recover payment under the Fishermen’s Fund. August 23, 1971, Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Labor may not adopt a regulation requiring that a reasonable deductible amount be satisfied on each claim before the Fund pays benefits. March 4, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

It is not required that an injury or accident be “directly caused” by the fishing endeavor; if the legislature had intended that interpretation, it seems likely that it would have said “directly caused by” rather than “directly connected with.” March 4, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

The cost of treatment by acupuncture is an expense that is covered by the Fishermen’s Fund. June 18, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

The council is limited by the plain meaning of this section, which incorporates the federal definition by reference, to define Alaska waters as including to the 200 mile limit. March 30, 1988, Op. Att’y Gen.

The council can validly refuse to pay claims from Metlakatla fishermen who do not pay into the fund through the purchase of commercial license or gear holder permits even though he or she may be validly fishing in Metlakatla waters by tribal permit at the time of the injury. March 30, 1988, Op. Att’y Gen.

The fund is required to cover injuries that occur in the waters off Metlakatla, where fisheries are regulated by the tribal government of the Metlakatla Indian Community and not by the State of Alaska. March 30, 1988, Op. Att’y Gen.

Fishermen who are injured while they are performing “test fishing” are not entitled to benefits from the Fishermen’s Fund because they were not commercial fishing when they were injured. February 17, 1999 Op. Att’y Gen.

If the Indian Health Service, an Indian tribe, or a tribal organization treats an Alaska Native for injuries occurring as a result of commercial fishing, the Fishermen’s Fund is not responsible for paying the cost for medical treatment. Section 25 U.S.C.A. 1621e(b) does not give the Indian Health Service, an Indian tribe, or a tribal organization a right of recovery for health care against the Fishermen’s Fund because the Commercial Fishermen’s Fund Act is neither a state workers’ compensation law nor a state self-insured program. August 16, 2001 Op. Att’y Gen.

If a private or public health provider under contract with the Indian Health Service treats the same fisherman, the Indian Health Service is the payor of last resort and consequently the Fishermen’s Fund is responsible for the first $2,500 that the private or public health provider charges for medical treatment. August 16, 2001 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 23.35.080.
Emergency treatment for cardio-vascular diseases.

The department may pay the costs, within the maximum limitations, of emergency treatment, transportation, medical care, and hospitalization, necessitated by a cardio-vascular disease, if the department determines that the disease is attributable, directly or indirectly, to the fishing endeavor.

History.

(§ 5 ch 100 SLA 1951; am § 2 ch 99 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 59 SLA 1957)

Sec. 23.35.090.
Assistance after discharge.

A fisherman is also entitled to such assistance after discharge from the hospital during period of convalescence as the department allows in consideration of the condition of the fund.

History.

(§ 5 ch 100 SLA 1951; am § 2 ch 99 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 59 SLA 1957)

Sec. 23.35.100.
Transportation, hospital, nursing, medical, and surgical expenses.

The department may pay out of the fund all reasonable transportation charges incurred under AS

23.35.080

and

23.35.090

, including cost of returning the fisherman to the boat or home of the fisherman or to another place that reasonably meets with the fisherman’s convenience, and the reasonable hospital, nursing, medical, and surgical expense incurred in the examination, treatment, and care of the fisherman.

History.

(§ 6 ch 100 SLA 1951)

Administrative Code. —

For fishermen’s fund, see 8 AAC 55.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Money cannot be expended from the sick and disabled fishermen’s fund for the payment of charges for medicine prescribed by chiropractors. 1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 23.

It is illegal and criminal for a chiropractor, without additional qualifications, to prescribe drugs or medicine to sick or injured persons. 1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 23.

Chiropractors render medical services and are entitled to recover payment under the Fishermen’s Fund.
August 23, 1971 Op. Att’y Gen.

For discussion of the Fund’s power to seek reimbursement from claimants’ insurance carriers or medical providers where insurance has paid part or all of a claim, see March 4, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

Absent an assignment of the claim from the injured person, the Fishermen’s Fund may not sue third parties for negligence which caused or contributed to the injury, and even with an assignment, it would not be advised. March 4, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

The Fishermen’s Fund may recover overpayments made by mistake. March 4, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Labor could adopt regulations limiting the availability of benefits under AS 23.35 to persons who have no insurance, as this would accord with the department’s interpretation of the purpose of the Fund. March 4, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

The cost of treatment by acupuncture is an expense that is covered by the Fishermen’s Fund. June 18, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 23.35.110.
Contracts for care.

In carrying out this chapter, the department may enter into contracts or other arrangements with hospitals and doctors in the state for furnishing care on an annual basis to persons entitled to benefits.
Contracting under this section is governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code).

History.

(§ 6 ch 100 SLA 1951; am § 22 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 23.35.120.
Cooperation with other agencies.

In providing care the department shall provide the type and quality of treatment that will restore the fisherman to health and productivity, if possible.
The department may enter into cooperative arrangements with agencies of the federal government, other states and territories, and private clinics and rehabilitation centers for the care and treatment of fishermen.

History.

(§ 7 ch 100 SLA 1951)

Sec. 23.35.130.
Duration of care.

Except for compelling reasons, compensation may not be paid for the care of any one person involving a single injury or disability beyond a period of one year from the date of initial allowance.

History.

(§ 7 ch 100 SLA 1951)

Administrative Code. —

For fishermen’s fund, see 8 AAC 55.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The legislature intended a relatively liberal interpretation of the act. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 5.

For scope of term “compelling reasons”, see 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 5.

With respect to a pre-existing injury, that is, one for which benefits have been paid under the Act, if subsequent aggravation is attributable strictly to that injury, and does not amount to a new injury, then, as with a recurring disability, the Act does not appear to confer benefits, for it remains a “single injury.” March 4, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 23.35.140.
Limitation on benefits.

Except for compelling reasons,

compensation may not be paid for medical care or hospitalization furnished before the ascertainable time of injury, or before authorization in the case of disability caused by an occupational disease;

the total allowance for any one injury or disablement is $10,000.

The total allowance for any one heart attack is $10,000.

History.

(§ 7 ch 100 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 103 SLA 1965; am § 1 ch 166 SLA 1968; am § 2 ch 103 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For fishermen’s fund, see 8 AAC 55.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective June 16, 2010, substituted “$10,000” for “$2,500” in (a)(2) and in (b).

Opinions of attorney general. —

There might be many very “compelling reasons” to raise the benefits above $2,500 under some circumstances. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 5.

With respect to a pre-existing injury, that is, one for which benefits have been paid under the Act, if subsequent aggravation is attributable strictly to that injury, and does not amount to a new injury, then, as with a recurring disability, the Act does not appear to confer benefits, for it remains a “single injury.” March 4, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 23.35.145.
Claim of vessel owner.

If a fisherman files a claim for benefits under this chapter and also files a claim against the protection and indemnity insurance policy of the vessel owner, the vessel owner is entitled to receive a benefit, not to exceed the amount of the actual loss, that is the lesser of

the full amount of the protection and indemnity insurance policy deductible; or

$5,000.

History.

(§ 3 ch 103 SLA 2010; am § 1 ch 25 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective December 9, 2019, in (a)(1), substituted “the full amount” for “50 percent of the amount.”

Effective dates. —

Section 6, ch. 103, SLA 2010 makes this section effective June 26, 2010, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Editor’s notes. —

Sec. 5, ch. 103, SLA 2010 provides that this section “applies to a claim filed by a fisherman under AS 23.35 on or after June 26, 2010.”

Sec. 23.35.150.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“approved medical facilities” and “medical care” include the facilities of, or the care and treatment prescribed or performed by, a practitioner of chiropractic licensed by the state under AS 08.20;

“council” means the Fishermen’s Fund Advisory and Appeals Council;

“fisherman” means a person who is licensed by the state to engage in commercial fishing under AS

16.05.480

or who is the holder of a permit issued under AS 16.43 and who, at the time injury is sustained or illness is contracted, is actually so engaged or is occupied in Alaska in preparing or dismantling boats or gear used in commercial fishing;

“fund” means the Fishermen’s Fund;

“occupational disease” means hernia; varicose veins of the leg; the respiratory diseases, bronchitis, pleurisy, and pneumonia caused by or aggravated by the fishing endeavor, but excluding the common cold and influenza; rheumatism, arthritis, and those musculoskeletal diseases (such as bursitis, traumatic sciatica, and tenosynovitis) directly caused by or aggravated by the fishing endeavor; and does not include a disease not common to both sexes, venereal disease, or a condition arising out of an attempt of a fisherman to injure self or another.

History.

(§§ 4, 5, 8 ch 100 SLA 1951; am §§ 1, 2, ch 99 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 59 SLA 1957; am § 13 ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 93 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 77 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 51 SLA 1972; am § 17 ch 105 SLA 1977; am § 38 ch 168 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section was reorganized in 1984 to place the defined terms in alphabetical order and in 1996 to delete repealed paragraphs.

Administrative Code. —

For fishermen’s fund, see 8 AAC 55.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Persons who are primary fish buyers and packers are “commercial fishing” under AS

16.05.940

(5) so as to qualify them as “fishermen” under paragraph (5) (now (3)) of this section to receive benefits from the Fishermen’s Fund. March 8, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

This section does not preclude the payment to a fisherman who holds a valid Alaska commercial fishing license or gear license, but chooses to commercial fish in Metlakatla waters where a special permit only is required to authorize such fishing. March 30, 1988 Op. Att’y Gen.